Indiana, session 2026, HB1209.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 36-1-8.6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 8.6. Municipal Collections
Sec. 1. This chapter applies to a municipality after December 31,
2026.
Sec. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, this chapter establishes
requirements for invoices and delinquency notices issued by a
municipality. However, this chapter does not apply to invoices and
notices for collection of:
(1) a tax, special assessment, or other fee or debt for which a
procedure for invoicing or collection is established by statute;
or
(2) payments under the terms of a contract.
Sec. 3. A municipality must invoice monthly.
Sec. 4. A municipality shall invoice a person on a form
prescribed by the state board of accounts.
2026 IN 1209—LS 6850/DI 87


Sec. 5. An invoice must include at least the following
information:
(1) The person's name and address.
(2) The invoice number and date issued.
(3) A description of the goods or services provided for which
payment is requested.
(4) The date the municipality provided the goods or services
for which payment is requested.
(5) The payment due date, which must be thirty (30) calendar
days after the date of the invoice.
(6) The amount due.
(7) Acceptable methods of payment.
(8) The payment address.
(9) The amount of any fee or interest assessed if full payment
is not received by the due date.
(10) A contact and telephone number the person may call if
there are questions.
(11) A reference to:
(A) the ordinance or statute authorizing the charge; and
(B) the fund that the payment will be deposited into.
(12) If the amount of the invoice is disputed, contact
information of an officer or employee of the municipality to
call before the payment due date.
(13) If unable to pay, contact information of an officer or
employee of the municipality to call before the payment due
date, to discuss a payment plan.
Sec. 6. If an invoice is unpaid by the payment due date specified
under section 5(5) of this chapter, a delinquency notice, on a form
prescribed by the state board of accounts, must accompany the
next monthly invoice. The reminder notice must contain at least the
following information:
(1) The person's, name, address, and account number.
(2) The date of the reminder notice and accompanying
invoice.
(3) The number of days that payment is overdue, the amount
of the overdue balance, plus any accrued late payment fees or
interest on the overdue balance as of the date provided in
subdivision (2).
(4) The acceptable methods of payment.
(5) The payment address.
(6) A statement that if not paid in full within thirty (30) days
after the date of the notice in subdivision (2):
2026 IN 1209—LS 6850/DI 87


(A) late fees or interest will continue to accrue and the
formal collections process will begin;
(B) the invoice will be referred to a municipal collections
officer, municipal collections department, legal
department, or collection agency, if applicable;
(C) adverse information regarding the payor may be
reported to consumer credit reporting agencies; and
(D) a civil action may be filed that may result in
garnishment of wages, bank accounts, or other personal
property, judgment liens, or other legal collection activity.
(7) The notice must be signed by the appropriate fiscal officer
(as defined in IC 36-1-2-7). If the notice concerns a
delinquency of a fiscal officer, the notice must be signed by the
president of the legislative body of the municipality.
Sec. 7. Nothing in this chapter prohibits a municipality from
resolving a delinquency through mediation.
Sec. 8. If a person believes that a charge or fee is erroneous, the
person shall notify the municipality in writing. The person shall
include the person's address, the invoice number, and a description
of the error asserted by the person, and any other information that
the municipality reasonably requires to process the request.
SECTION 2. IC 36-1-8.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 8.7. Separation of Responsibilities and Activities
Sec. 1. This chapter applies to the invoicing and collection of
fees and charges by a municipality that are owed by an officer or
employee of the municipality.
Sec. 2. Except as provided in sections 3 and 4 of this chapter, a
municipal officer or employee is subject to IC 36-1-8.6 regarding
deadlines for payment, invoicing, and collection of overdue
balances with regard to fees and charges owed by the officer or
employee to the municipality.
Sec. 3. A municipal officer or employee who has access to or
oversight of the municipality's payment system may not have the
responsibility of reporting or recording payments received.
Sec. 4. A municipal officer whose official duties include
oversight of reporting, recording, or monitoring of municipal
accounts, may not have access to the municipal officer's own
account with the municipality.
Sec. 5. If a municipal officer or employee is delinquent more
than sixty (60) days on an invoice, the delinquency must be
2026 IN 1209—LS 6850/DI 87


reported to the fiscal officer of the municipality. However, if the
personal account of the fiscal officer of the municipality or the
municipal executive is delinquent, the delinquency must be
reported to the legislative body of the municipality.
2026 IN 1209—LS 6850/DI 87